Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1605
Private, denominational, or parochial schools; inspection by public school official; when required; applicability.

(1) The superintendent of the school district in which any private, denominational, or parochial school is located shall inspect such schools and report to the proper officers any evidence of failure to observe any of the provisions of sections 79-1601 to 79-1607. The Commissioner of Education, when in his or her judgment it is deemed advisable, may appoint a public school official other than such superintendent, including a member of the State Department of Education, for such inspections. Such appointee shall hold a Nebraska certificate to administer. The State Board of Education shall require the superintendents and appointed public school officials to make such inspections at least twice a year, and the school officers of such schools and the teachers giving instruction in such schools shall permit such inspection and assist and cooperate in the making of the same.

(2) This section does not apply to (a) any private, denominational, or parochial school which elects not to meet accreditation or approval requirements pursuant to the procedures prescribed in subsections (2) through (6) of section 79-1601 or (b) a school inspected by an area or diocesan representative holding a Nebraska certificate to administer.

Laws 1919, c. 155, § 6, p. 349;

Laws 1921, c. 53, § 1(m), p. 231;

C.S.1922, § 6508k;

C.S.1929, § 79-1911;

R.S.1943, § 79-1918;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 510, p. 865;

Laws 1971, LB 254, § 1;

Laws 1973, LB 395, § 1;

Laws 1978, LB 441, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1705;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1008;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 114;

Laws 2003, LB 685, § 26;

Laws 2021, LB528, § 45;

Laws 2024, LB1027, § 2.
July 19, 2024
This section did not violate constitutional provision respecting freedom of religion. Meyerkorth v. State, 173 Neb. 889, 115 N.W.2d 585 (1962).